Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1055.
do enact as follows:AB1055,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1055,26Section 2. 20.455 (5) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1055,2,9720.455 (5) (dm) Crime victim protective services grant program. Biennially, 8the amounts in the schedule to provide grants to law enforcement agencies and 9prosecutorial units under s. 165.925.AB1055,310Section 3. 165.925 of the statutes is created to read:AB1055,2,1211165.925 Crime victim protective services grant program. (1) In this 12section:AB1055,2,1313(a) “Crime victim” means a person against whom a crime has been committed.AB1055,2,1414(b) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (bv).AB1055,2,1515(c) “Prosecutorial unit” means a prosecutorial unit described in s. 978.01 (1).AB1055,2,1816(2) From the appropriation under s. 20.455 (5) (dm), the department of justice 17shall award grants to law enforcement agencies and prosecutorial units to fund 18crime victim protective services, including temporary housing for crime victims.AB1055,2,2119(3) The department of justice shall develop criteria that, notwithstanding s. 20227.10 (1), need not be promulgated as rules under ch. 227 for use in awarding 21grants under sub. (2).AB1055,422Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1055,3,423(1) Authorized positions; crime victim protective services grant 1program. The authorized FTE positions for the department of justice are 2increased by 1.0 GPR grants specialist position, to be funded from the 3appropriation under s. 20.455 (5) (dm), for the purpose of administering the crime 4victim protective services grant program under s. 165.925.AB1055,3,55